src/third-party/hunspell-dictionaries/uk.aff
SFX K Y 145
SFX K       [^  ]   
SFX K       [^  ]   
SFX K       [^  ]   
SFX K      [      ]   
SFX K              
SFX K              
SFX K              
SFX K      0      
SFX K                
SFX K                
SFX K                
SFX K               
SFX K            
SFX K             
SFX K            
SFX K              
SFX K              
SFX K              
SFX K            
SFX K             
SFX K            
SFX K              
SFX K              
SFX K              
SFX K                    
SFX K                     
SFX K                    
SFX K                      
SFX K                      
SFX K                      
SFX K                    
SFX K                      
SFX K                      
SFX K                    
SFX K                     
SFX K                    
SFX K                      
SFX K                      
SFX K                      
SFX K                    
SFX K                      
SFX K                      
SFX K                    
SFX K                     
SFX K                    
SFX K                      
SFX K                      
SFX K                      
SFX K                    
SFX K                      
SFX K                      
SFX K                    
SFX K                     
SFX K                    
SFX K                      
SFX K                      
SFX K                      
SFX K                    
SFX K                      
SFX K                      
SFX K        '  [   ]     
SFX K        '   [   ]     
SFX K        '  [   ]     
SFX K        '    [   ]     
SFX K        '    [   ]     
SFX K        '    [   ]     
SFX K        '  [   ]     
SFX K        '   [   ]     
SFX K        '  [   ]     
SFX K        '    [   ]     
SFX K        '    [   ]     
SFX K        '    [   ]     
SFX K        '  [   ]     
SFX K        '   [   ]     
SFX K        '  [   ]     
SFX K        '    [   ]     
SFX K        '    [   ]     
SFX K        '    [   ]     
SFX K           [    ]     
SFX K            [    ]     
SFX K           [    ]     
SFX K             [    ]     
SFX K             [    ]     
SFX K             [    ]     
SFX K      [    ]    
SFX K        [    ]    
SFX K        [    ]    
SFX K           
SFX K            
SFX K             
SFX K            
SFX K             
SFX K              
SFX K           
SFX K             
SFX K             
SFX K             
SFX K              
SFX K             
SFX K               
SFX K               
SFX K               
SFX K             
SFX K               
SFX K               
SFX K            
SFX K             
SFX K            
SFX K              
SFX K              
SFX K              
SFX K       .     
SFX K         .     
SFX K         .     
SFX K             
SFX K              
SFX K             
SFX K               
SFX K               
SFX K               
SFX K             
SFX K               
SFX K               
SFX K                 
SFX K                  
SFX K                 
SFX K                   
SFX K                   
SFX K                   
SFX K                 
SFX K                   
SFX K                   
SFX K               
SFX K                
SFX K               
SFX K                 
SFX K                 
SFX K                 
SFX K             
SFX K             
SFX K             
SFX K            
SFX K               
SFX K                 
SFX K                 
SFX M Y 86
SFX M       [^   ]   
SFX M       [^   ]   
SFX M       [^   ]   
SFX M      [     ]   
SFX M             
SFX M              
SFX M             
SFX M               
SFX M               
SFX M               
SFX M             
SFX M               
SFX M               
SFX M           [^ ]     
SFX M            [^ ]     
SFX M           [^ ]     
SFX M             [^ ]     
SFX M             [^ ]     
SFX M             [^ ]     
SFX M           [^ ]     
SFX M             [^ ]     
SFX M             [^ ]     
SFX M       [  ]   
SFX M        [  ]   
SFX M       [  ]   
SFX M         [  ]   
SFX M         [  ]   
SFX M         [  ]   
SFX M        [  ]   
SFX M        [  ]   
SFX M        [  ]   
SFX M        [  ]   
SFX M       [  ]   
SFX M         [  ]   
SFX M         [  ]   
SFX M              
SFX M               
SFX M              
SFX M                
SFX M                
SFX M                
SFX M              
SFX M                
SFX M                
SFX M                  
SFX M                   
SFX M                  
SFX M                    
SFX M                    
SFX M                    
SFX M                  
SFX M                    
SFX M                    
SFX M       [  ]    
SFX M        [  ]    
SFX M       [  ]    
SFX M         [  ]    
SFX M         [  ]    
SFX M         [  ]    
SFX M       [  ]    
SFX M            
SFX M              
SFX M              
SFX M        [   ]    
SFX M         [   ]    
SFX M        [   ]    
SFX M          [   ]    
SFX M          [   ]    
SFX M          [   ]    
SFX M            
SFX M            
SFX M            
SFX M       [^ ]    
SFX M              
SFX M        [   ]    
SFX M          [   ]    
SFX M          [   ]    
SFX M       [  ]    
SFX M      [  ]    
SFX M       [  ]    
SFX M        [  ]    
SFX M       [  ]    
SFX M               
SFX M            
SFX M              
SFX M              
